Idaho, session 2025, H0312.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-1102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the Idaho board of health and welfare.
(2) "Child" means a person less than thirteen (13) years of age.
(3) "Daycare" means care and supervision provided for compensation
during part of a twenty-four (24) hour day, for a child or children not
related by blood, marriage or legal guardianship to the person or persons
providing the care, in a place other than the child's or children's own home
or homes.
(4) "Daycare center" means a place or facility providing daycare for
compensation for thirteen (13) or more children.
(5) "Daycare facility" means a place or facility providing daycare
services for compensation to seven (7) or more children not related to the
provider.
(6) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(7) "Employee" means any person working for compensation in a facility
that provides daycare.
(8) "Family daycare home" means a home, place, or facility providing
daycare for six (6) or fewer children.
(9) "Group daycare facility" means a home, place, or facility providing
daycare for seven (7) to twelve (12) children.
(10) "Group size" means the maximum number of children in one (1) group
or classroom.
(11) "Mixed age group" means a care group that includes children of mul-
tiple ages.


(12) "Operator" means a person who operates or maintains a licensed day-
care facility.
(13) "Owner" means a person, group of individuals, or entity that has
legal control and authority over a daycare business.
(14) "Provider" means a person who provides care and supervision at a
daycare facility and is included in the child:staff ratio.
(12) (15) "Ratio" means the number of staff required to supervise a cer-
tain number of children.
(13) (16) "Single age group" means a care group that includes children
of similar age.
(17) "Staff" means anyone who is sixteen (16) years of age or older who
is employed by a daycare facility to provide care and supervision. "Staff"
includes operators, owners, and providers.
(14) (18) "Training" means continuing education in child development
areas relating to child care. Training can be acquired through a variety of
methods including, but not limited to, the viewing of audio visual materi-
als, correspondence courses, community workshops and in-house training.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-1106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1106. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE -- RENEWAL. (1) Upon receipt of the
completed application, inspection certificates and the criminal his-
tory, the department shall, upon a finding of compliance with the minimum
standards set forth in this chapter, issue a basic daycare license to the ap-
plicant within sixty (60) days. The license shall be valid for two (2) years,
unless suspended or revoked, and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at
the daycare facility.
(2) The department shall send a renewal application to the owner of the
daycare facility no later than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of
an existing license. The owner shall submit to the department the renewal
application with the required renewal fee and a criminal history check prior
to the expiration of the existing license. A complete criminal history check
shall be provided for any new persons requiring a criminal history check in
accordance with section 39-1105, Idaho Code.
(3) Criminal history checks on those persons under eighteen (18) years
of age shall include a check of the juvenile justice records of adjudications
of the magistrate division of the district court, county probation services
and department records as authorized by the minor and his parent or guardian.
(4) The department shall maintain a list of all licensees for public
use.
(5) Submission of a renewal application, fee and required criminal
history check shall entitle the daycare facility owner to continue daycare
services, subject to action by the department pursuant to section 39-1113,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-1107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1107. FEES. (1) The department shall establish by rule the maximum
total fee to be assessed for a basic daycare license which shall not exceed


three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) for daycare centers with more than
twenty-five (25) children in attendance at any given time, two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for daycare centers with thirteen (13) to twenty-five (25)
children in attendance at any given time and one hundred dollars ($100) for
group all other daycare facilities. Criminal history background check fees
shall be in addition, but at actual cost. No other fees shall be charged for
each license period. The department may allocate the fees to daycare licens-
ing administration costs as it deems appropriate.
(2) The department is authorized to utilize may use Idaho child care
program funds as otherwise allowed by law to pay for the costs associated
with licensing of daycare facilities to the extent that fees collected from
the facilities do not fully cover such costs. It is the intent of the leg-
islature that licensing fees and Idaho child care program funds shall fully
fund daycare facility licensing administration.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-1109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1109. SAFETY STANDARDS. (1) Daycare facilities, owners and opera-
tors shall comply with the following safety standards in the area of the day-
care facility in which daycare is provided:
(a) Adequate fire and smoke alarms;
(b) A functional telephone located on the daycare premises during the
hours of operation;
(c) Adequate fire extinguishers;
(d) Adequate exits;
(e) Firearms or other weapons which that are stored on the premises of a
daycare facility must be kept in a locked container that is inaccessible
to children while daycare attendees are present;
(f) Pools, hot tubs, ponds and other bodies of water that are on the day-
care facility premises must provide the following safeguards:
(i) The area surrounding the body of water must be fenced and
locked in a manner that prevents access by children and meets the
following requirements:
1. The fence must be at least four (4) feet high with no ver-
tical opening more than four (4) inches wide, be designed so
that a young child cannot climb or squeeze under or through
the fence, surround all sides of the pool and have a gate that
is self-closing and that has a self-latching mechanism in
proper working order out of the reach of young children;
2. If the house forms one (1) side of the barrier for the
pool, all doors that provide unrestricted access to the pool
must have alarms that produce an audible sound when the door
is opened;
3. Furniture or other large objects must not be left near the
fence in a manner that would enable a child to climb on the
furniture or other large object and gain access to the pool;
and
(ii) If the area surrounding a pool, hot tub, pond or other body of
water is not fenced and locked, there must be a secured protective
covering that will not allow access by a child;


(iii) Wading pools must be empty when not in use;
(iv) Children must be under direct supervision of at least one (1)
adult employee while using a pool, hot tub, pond or other body of
water; and
(v) A minimum of a four (4) foot high fence must be present that
prevents access from the daycare facility premises if the daycare
premises are adjacent to a body of water; and
(g) The owner or operator of a daycare facility shall ensure that at
all times when a child or children are present, at least one (1) adult
employee on the premises has current certification in pediatric rescue
breathing and first-aid first aid treatment from a certified instruc-
tor.
(2) No fire standards developed pursuant to this chapter shall be more
stringent than the standards contained in the International Fire Code, as
adopted by Idaho.
(3) At least one (1) adult employee must be present at all times when a
child or children are in attendance.
(4)(a) The maximum allowable child:staff ratio shall be a maximum of
twelve (12) points per staff member using the following point system:
(i) Each child in attendance under the age of twenty-four (24)
months shall equal two (2) points.
(ii) Each child in attendance from twenty-four (24) months to
under thirty-six (36) months of age shall equal one and one-half
(1 1/2) points.
(iii) Each child in attendance from thirty-six (36) months to un-
der five (5) years of age shall equal one (1) point.
(iv) Each child in attendance from five (5) years to under thir-
teen (13) years of age shall equal one-half (1/2) point.
(b) Each child in attendance shall be counted by the department for pur-
poses of calculating maximum allowable points, counting the number of
children in attendance and for determining compliance with child:staff
ratios.
(5) Sleeping children must be within sight and normal hearing range of a
provider.
(6) For daycare facilities providing overnight care of children:
(a) A sleeping child shall sleep on the same level as a staff member;
(b) At least one (1) staff member shall be awake and on duty;
(c) Sleeping children shall have separate cots, mats, or beds and blan-
kets; and
(d) A child shall not share a bed with a non-parent adult.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 11, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-1110A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-1110A. BEHAVIOR MANAGEMENT AND DISCIPLINE. Methods of behavior
management and discipline for children shall be positive, consistent, and
based on each child's needs, stage of development, and behavior. Discipline
is to promote self-control, self-esteem, and independence. The following
acts are prohibited:
(1) Any punishment inflicted on the body, including spanking;


(2) Cruel and unusual physical exercise, including forcing a child to
take an uncomfortable position;
(3) Use of excessive physical labor;
(4) Use of restraints;
(5) Locking a child in a room or area;
(6) Denying necessities, including food, clothing, bedding, rest, toi-
let use, personal care and sanitation, or entrance to the home or facility;
and
(7) Mental or emotional cruelty or verbal abuse.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-1113, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1113. DENIAL, SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF LICENSE. (1) The depart-
ment shall investigate complaints against daycare facilities. If a prelim-
inary investigation indicates that a more complete investigation is neces-
sary, the operator of the facility shall be informed of the investigation and
any action to be taken.
(1) (2) A license may be denied, suspended or revoked by the department
if the department finds that the applicant or licensee does not comply with
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) (3) No person who pleads guilty to, has been found guilty of or re-
ceived a withheld judgment for any offense involving neglect or any physi-
cal injury to or other abuse of a child, including the following offenses or
a similar provision in another jurisdiction, shall be eligible for a license
under the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Felony injury of a child, section 18-1501, Idaho Code.
(b) The sexual abuse of a child under sixteen years of age, section
18-1506, Idaho Code.
(c) The ritualized abuse of a child under eighteen years of age, section
18-1506A, Idaho Code.
(d) The sexual exploitation of a child, section 18-1507, Idaho Code.
(e) Sexual abuse of a child under the age of sixteen years, section
18-1506, Idaho Code.
(f) Lewd conduct with a child under the age of sixteen years, section
18-1508, Idaho Code.
(g) The sale or barter of a child for adoption or other purposes, sec-
tion 18-1511, Idaho Code.
(h) Murder in any degree, section 18-4001 or 18-4003, Idaho Code.
(i) Assault with intent to murder, section 18-4015, Idaho Code.
(j) Voluntary manslaughter, section 18-4006, Idaho Code.
(k) Rape, section 18-6101, Idaho Code.
(l) Incest, section 18-6601, Idaho Code.
(m) Forcible sexual penetration by use of foreign object, section
18-6604, Idaho Code.
(n) Abuse, neglect or exploitation of a vulnerable adult, section
18-1505, Idaho Code.
(o) Aggravated, first degree, second degree and third degree arson,
sections 18-801 through 18-805, Idaho Code.


(p) The infamous crime against nature, a felony offense formerly cod-
ified in chapter 66, title 18, Idaho Code, and whose conviction is en-
tered before July 1, 2022.
(q) Kidnapping, sections 18-4501 through 18-4503, Idaho Code.
(r) Mayhem, section 18-5001, Idaho Code.
(s) Poisoning, section 18-4014 or 18-5501, Idaho Code.
(t) Robbery, section 18-6501, Idaho Code.
(u) Stalking in the first degree, section 18-7905, Idaho Code.
(v) Video voyeurism, section 18-6605, Idaho Code.
(w) Enticing of children, section 18-1509 or 18-1509A, Idaho Code.
(x) Inducing a child into commercial sexual activity, section 18-5609,
Idaho Code.
(y) Inducing a child to engage in commercial sexual activity, section
18-5611, Idaho Code.
(z) Any felony punishable by death or life imprisonment.
(aa) Attempt, section 18-306, Idaho Code, conspiracy, section 18-1701,
Idaho Code, or accessory after the fact, section 18-205, Idaho Code, to
commit any of the crimes designated in this subsection.
(bb) Domestic violence, section 18-918(2), Idaho Code.
(cc) Any offense requiring registration on a state sex offender reg-
istry or the national sex offender registry.
(dd) A felony drug-related offense committed during the preceding five
(5) years.
(ee) Sexual abuse of an animal, section 18-6602, Idaho Code.
(ff) Sexual abuse of human remains, section 18-6603, Idaho Code.
(3) (4) No person who has pleaded guilty to, been found guilty of or re-
ceived a withheld judgment for any offense involving neglect or any physi-
cal injury to or other abuse of a child, including the following offenses or
a similar provision in another jurisdiction, shall be eligible for a license
for a period of five (5) years under the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Aggravated assault, section 18-905, Idaho Code.
(b) Aggravated battery, section 18-907(1), Idaho Code.
(c) Burglary, section 18-1401, Idaho Code.
(d) Felony theft, sections 18-2403 and 18-2407(1), Idaho Code.
(e) Forgery of a financial transaction card, section 18-3123, Idaho
Code.
(f) Fraudulent use of a financial transaction card or number, section
18-3124, Idaho Code.
(g) Forgery or counterfeiting, chapter 36, title 18, Idaho Code.
(h) Misappropriation of personal identifying information, section
18-3126, Idaho Code.
(i) Insurance fraud, section 41-293, Idaho Code.
(j) Damage to or destruction of insured property, section 41-294, Idaho
Code.
(k) Public assistance fraud, section 56-227, Idaho Code.
(l) Provider fraud, section 56-227A, Idaho Code.
(m) Attempted strangulation, section 18-923, Idaho Code.
(n) Attempt, section 18-306, Idaho Code, conspiracy, section 18-1701,
Idaho Code, or accessory after the fact, section 18-205, Idaho Code, to
commit any of the crimes designated in this subsection.


(o) Misdemeanor injury to a child, section 18-1501(2), Idaho Code.
(4) (5) A daycare facility license may be denied, suspended or revoked
by the department if the department finds that the daycare facility is not in
compliance with the standards provided for in this chapter or criminal ac-
tivity that threatens the health or safety of a child.
(5) (6) A daycare facility license or privilege to operate a family day-
care home shall be denied or revoked if a registered sex offender resides on
the premises where daycare services are provided.
(7) When circumstances occur over which an operator has no control, a
license may be suspended until the nonconformity is remedied. If a license
is summarily suspended, children at the facility shall not be transported
from the facility, but the parents or legal guardians of the children shall
be contacted.
(8) A license may be suspended for violations of this chapter. Such
suspension may lead to revocation if the operator fails to demonstrate to the
department's satisfaction that the violations have been corrected.
(9) The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license may occur if the
owner or operator: fails to furnish records required by the department; has
been found guilty of or is under investigation for fraud associated with the
operation of the daycare facility or any felony; has knowingly permitted,
aided, or abetted the commission of any illegal act on the premises of the
daycare facility; endangers health or safety; has repeated law violations;
misrepresents or omits information; refuses to allow access to the facility
or documentation; or engages in abusive conduct.
(6) (10) The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license under this
chapter may be appealed through the administrative appeals process governed
by the provisions of IDAPA 16.05.03 chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, with
the opportunity for further review by the district court of the county in
which the affected daycare facility is located.
(11) The department shall not accept an application from any person,
corporation, or partnership, including any managing employee, officer,
owner, or spouse or partner of an owner of an entity, that has had a license
denied or revoked until five (5) years has elapsed from the final date of the
disciplinary action.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-1119, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1119. TRAINING REQUIREMENTS. The owner or operator of a day care
daycare center shall ensure that each employee receives four (4) hours of
ongoing training in child development areas related to daycare every twelve
(12) months after the employee's hire date. Each staff member counting
toward the child:staff ratio shall have current certification in pediatric
rescue breathing and pediatric first aid from a certified instructor. The
owner or operator is responsible for maintaining documentation of each staff
member's training.
SECTION 8. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.06.03, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Daycare Licensing, Section 010.; Section
011.; Section 100.; Section 101.; Section 122.; Section 124.; Section 300.;
Section 301.; Section 330.; Section 350.; Section 421.; Section 440.; Sec-


tion 441.; Section 442.; Section 443.; Section 444.; Section 450.; Section
451.; and Section 452., shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and
after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.